Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNITED HMONG FAMILY.new text end new text begin $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the United Hmong Family to provide dance and other arts and cultural programming. new text end